Utah statutes.
10-9a-401.   General plan required -- Content.

(1)  In order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, each municipality shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive, long-range general plan for:

(a)  present and future needs of the municipality; and

(b)  growth and development of all or any part of the land within the municipality.

(2)  The plan may provide for:

(a)  health, general welfare, safety, energy conservation, transportation, prosperity, civic activities, aesthetics, and recreational, educational, and cultural opportunities;

(b)  the reduction of the waste of physical, financial, or human resources that result from either excessive congestion or excessive scattering of population;

(c)  the efficient and economical use, conservation, and production of the supply of:

(i)  food and water; and

(ii)  drainage, sanitary, and other facilities and resources;

(d)  the use of energy conservation and solar and renewable energy resources;

(e)  the protection of urban development;

(f)  the protection or promotion of moderate income housing;

(g)  the protection and promotion of air quality;

(h)  historic preservation;

(i)  identifying future uses of land that are likely to require an expansion or significant modification of services or facilities provided by each affected entity; and

(j)  an official map.

(3) Subject to Subsection 10-9a-403(2), the municipality may determine the comprehensiveness, extent, and format of the general plan.

